Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 1. Agricultural Property.

Secs. 34.05.010 — 34.05.020.
[Repealed, § 4 ch 10 SLA 1974.]

Sec. 34.05.025.
Agricultural tenants.

A tenant whose lease or occupancy is for agricultural purposes and who breaches the rental agreement, or continues in possession of the premises at the expiration of the time limited in or contrary to a condition or covenant in the lease or agreement under which the tenant holds, shall be provided with a written notice specifying the breach and demanding the tenant quit the premises at least 30 days before commencement of an action for the recovery of the property.
The tenant shall have free access to the premises to cultivate and harvest crops or produce planted by the tenant before the service of the notice of the breach and demand to quit the premises.

History.

(§ 2 ch 10 SLA 1974)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.45.496(b).
Renumbered as
AS

34.03.115

in 1983.
Renumbered again in 1985.